Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5813
Application requirements; waiver; when.

Upon request from a third-party administrator, the director may waive the application requirements of subsection (2) of section 44-5812 if the third-party administrator has a valid certificate of authority as a third-party administrator issued in a state which has requirements for third-party administrators that are at least as stringent as those contained in the Third-Party Administrator Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 88.